sl-SI: Uporaba sukanca za prešivanje: Večnamensko prešivanje; Aplikacija; Ročno prešivanje; Longarm prešivanje; Strojno sestavljanje kosov; Strojno prešivanje; Sukanec za prešivanje (za spodnji vretenec); Drugo
hr-HR: Korištenje niz poruka za prošivanje: Višenamjensko prošivanje; Aplikacija; Ručno prošivanje; Prošivanje longarm strojem; Strojno spajanje (patchwork); Strojno prošivanje; Konac za špulicu za prošivanje; Ostalo
es: Uso de acolchado para el hilo: Acolchado multiusos; Aplique; Acolchado a mano; Acolchado de brazo largo; Unión a máquina; Acolchado a máquina; Hilo de bobina para acolchar; Otro
pl: Zastosowanie nici do pikowania: Pikowanie uniwersalne; Aplikacja; Pikowanie ręczne; Pikowanie na maszynie longarm; Zszywanie maszynowe; Pikowanie maszynowe; Nici bębenkowe do pikowania; Inne
nl: Quiltdraad gebruik: Universeel quilten; Appliqué; Handquilten; Longarm-quilten; Machinaal patchwork; Machinaal quilten; Quiltspoelgaren; Overig
de: Verwendungszweck des Quiltgarns: Allzweck-Quilten; Applikation; Handquilten; Longarm-Quilten; Maschinen-Piecing; Maschinenquilten; Quilt-Unterfaden; Sonstige
da: Brug af quiltetråd: Universel quiltning; Applikation; Håndquiltning; Longarm-quiltning; Maskinsammensyning; Maskinquiltning; Undertråd til quiltning; Andet
cs: Použití prošívací nitě: Univerzální prošívání; Aplikace; Ruční prošívání; Prošívání na rámu (longarm); Strojové sešívání; Strojové prošívání; Spodní nit pro prošívání; Jiné
vi: Cách sử dụng chỉ may chần: Chần bông đa năng; Đắp giống (Appliqué); Chần bông bằng tay; Chần bông máy thân dài; Ghép vải bằng máy; Chần bông bằng máy; Chỉ suốt chần bông; Khác
pt-PT: Utilização da linha de acolchoar: Acolchoamento multiúsos; Aplicações; Acolchoamento à mão; Acolchoamento em máquina longarm; Patchwork à máquina; Acolchoamento à máquina; Fio de bobina para acolchoamento; Outro
tr: Kapitone ipliği kullanım amacı: Çok amaçlı kapitone dikişi; Aplike; Elde kapitone dikişi; Longarm kapitone dikişi; Makinede yama birleştirme; Makinede kapitone dikişi; Kapitone masura ipliği; Diğer
ko: 퀼팅실 용도: 다목적 퀼팅용; 아플리케용; 손 퀼팅용; 롱암 퀼팅용; 재봉틀 피싱용; 재봉틀 퀼팅용; 퀼팅 보빈 실; 기타
sv: Användningsområde för quiltningstråd: Allround-quiltning; Applikation; Handquiltning; Longarm-quiltning; Maskinell lappteknik; Maskinquiltning; Undertråd för quiltning; Övrigt
en: Quilting thread usage: All-purpose quilting; Appliqué; Hand quilting; Longarm quilting; Machine piecing; Machine quilting; Quilting bobbin thread; Other
ro-RO: Utilizarea firului de matlasare: Quilting universal; Aplicații; Quilting manual; Quilting pe mașină longarm; Asamblare la mașină (piecing); Quilting la mașină; Ață de suveică pentru quilting; Altele
el: Χρήση κλωστής για quilting: Καπιτονέ πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Απλικέ; Καπιτονέ στο χέρι; Καπιτονέ με μηχανή longarm; Συναρμολόγηση με μηχανή; Καπιτονέ με μηχανή; Νήμα μασουριού για καπιτονέ; Άλλο
zh-CN: 绗缝线用途: 多用途绗缝; 贴布绣; 手工绗缝; 长臂绗缝; 缝纫机拼布; 缝纫机绗缝; 绗缝底线; 其他
fr: Usage du fil à quilter: Matelassage tout usage; Appliqué; Matelassage à la main; Matelassage à bras long; Assemblage à la machine; Matelassage à la machine; Fil de canette pour matelassage; Autre
th: การใช้ด้ายเย็บผ้าควิลท์: งานควิลท์อเนกประสงค์; งานแอปปลิเก้; งานควิลท์ด้วยมือ; งานควิลท์ด้วยจักรลองอาร์ม; งานต่อผ้าด้วยจักร; งานควิลท์ด้วยจักร; ด้ายกระสวยงานควิลท์; อื่นๆ
it: Utilizzo thread per trapuntatura: Quilting universale; Appliqué; Quilting a mano; Quilting longarm; Piecing a macchina; Quilting a macchina; Filo per bobina da quilting; Altro
sk-SK: Použitie vlákna na prešívanie: Univerzálne prešívanie; Nášivky; Ručné prešívanie; Prešívanie na dlhom ramene; Strojové zošívanie; Strojové prešívanie; Spodná niť na prešívanie; Iné
lt-LT: Skiautinių siūlo naudojimas: Universalus daigstymas; Aplikacijos; Daigstymas rankomis; Daigstymas „Longarm“ mašina; Skiautinių siuvimas mašina; Daigstymas mašina; Daigstymo ritės siūlai; Kita
ru: Назначение нити для квилтинга: Универсальная стежка; Аппликация; Ручная стежка; Стежка на лонгарм-машине; Машинный пэчворк; Машинная стежка; Шпульная нить для стежки; Другое
fi: Tikkauslangan käyttö: Yleisvanutukseen; Applikointi; Käsin tikkaus; Longarm-tikkaus; Koneompelu; Konetikkaus; Tikkauksen alalanka; Muu
zh-TW: 拼布線用途: 通用絎縫; 貼花; 手工絎縫; 長臂絎縫; 機器拼布; 機器絎縫; 絎縫底線; 其他
nb: Bruk av stikksømtråd: Universell quilting; Applikasjon; Håndquilting; Longarm-quilting; Maskinsammensying; Maskinquilting; Undertråd for quilting; Annet
hu: Steppelő cérna felhasználása: Általános foltvarrás; Applikáció; Kézi foltvarrás; Hosszúkaros foltvarrás; Gépi varrás; Gépi foltvarrás; Foltvarró orsócérna; Egyéb
bg-BG: Предназначение на конеца за капитониране: Универсално капитониране; Апликация; Ръчно капитониране; Капитониране с дълго рамо; Машинно съединяване; Машинно капитониране; Конец за калерче за капитониране; Друго
pt-BR: Linha para quilting uso: Quilting de uso geral; Aplique; Quilting à mão; Quilting em máquina longarm; Patchwork à máquina; Quilting à máquina; Linha de bobina para quilting; Outro
ja: キルティング糸の用途: 万能キルティング; アップリケ; ハンドキルティング; ロングアームキルティング; ミシンピーシング; ミシンキルティング; キルティングボビン糸; その他